Washington statutes.
RCW 39.35.040

Facility design to include life-cycle cost analysis.

Whenever a public agency determines that any major facility or a critical governmental facility is to be constructed or renovated, such agency shall cause to be included in the design phase of such construction or renovation a provision that requires a life-cycle cost analysis conforming with the guidelines developed in RCW 39.35.050 to be prepared for such facility. Such analysis shall be approved by the agency prior to the commencement of actual construction or renovation. A public agency may accept the facility design if the agency is satisfied that the life-cycle cost analysis provides for an efficient energy system or systems based on the economic life of the facility.

Nothing in this section prohibits the construction or renovation of major facilities or critical governmental facilities that utilize renewable energy or combined heat and power systems.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 19 s 5; 1994 c 242 s 2; 1982 c 159 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 177 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 39.35.010.

Applicability—1982 c 159: See notes following RCW 39.35.010.